Illinois, session 104th, HB5403.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearms Restraining Order Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 67/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Family member of the respondent" means a spouse, former 9spouse, person with whom the respondent has a minor child in 10common, parent, child, or step-child of the respondent, any 11other person related by blood or present marriage to the 12respondent, or a person who shares a common dwelling with the 13respondent.14    "Firearms restraining order" means an order issued by the 15court, prohibiting and enjoining a named person from having in 16his or her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, or 17receiving any firearms or ammunition, or removing firearm 18parts that could be assembled to make an operable firearm. 19    "Intimate partner" means a spouse, former spouse, a person 20with whom the respondent has or allegedly has a child in 21common, or a person with whom the respondent has or has had a 22dating or engagement relationship.23    "Petitioner" means:  HB5403- 2 -LRB104 19684 BDA 33133 b1        (1) a family member of the respondent as defined in 2    this Act; or 3        (2) a law enforcement officer who files a petition 4    alleging that the respondent poses a danger of causing 5    personal injury to himself, herself, or another by having 6    in his or her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, 7    or receiving a firearm, ammunition, or firearm parts that 8    could be assembled to make an operable firearm or removing 9    firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 10    firearm; or .11        (3) any medical personnel, social services and mental 12    health personnel, crisis intervention personnel, or 13    education personnel as described in Section 4 of the 14    Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act. 15    "Respondent" means the person alleged in the petition to 16pose a danger of causing personal injury to himself, herself, 17or another by having in his or her custody or control, 18purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, ammunition, or 19firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 20firearm or removing firearm parts that could be assembled to 21make an operable firearm.22(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-345, eff. 6-1-22.)